Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.220

Powers relative to water supply.

If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan water supply, it shall have the following powers in addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1) To prepare a comprehensive plan for the development of sources of water supply, trunk supply mains and water treatment and storage facilities for the metropolitan area.

(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of metropolitan facilities for water supply within or without the metropolitan area, including buildings, structures, water sheds, wells, springs, dams, settling basins, intakes, treatment plants, trunk supply mains and pumping stations, together with all lands, property, equipment and accessories necessary to enable the metropolitan municipal corporation to obtain and develop sources of water supply, treat and store water and deliver water through trunk supply mains. Water supply facilities which are owned by a city or special district may be acquired or used by the metropolitan municipal corporation only with the consent of the legislative body of the city or special district owning such facilities. Cities and special districts are hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to metropolitan municipal corporations or to contract for their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the legislative body of such city or special district and the metropolitan council, without submitting the matter to the voters of such city or special district.

(3) To fix rates and charges for water supplied by the metropolitan municipal corporation.

(4) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant and to lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of facilities for the local distribution of water in portions of the metropolitan area not contained within any city, or water-sewer district that operates a water system, and, with the consent of the legislative body of any city or the water-sewer district, to exercise such powers within such city or water-sewer district and for such purpose to have all the powers conferred by law upon such city or water-sewer district with respect to such local distribution facilities. All costs of such local distribution facilities shall be paid for by the area served thereby.

[ 1999 c 153 s 34; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.220. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 22.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.